Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20182-10,115
Violations; penalties; appeal of
department order; procedure.

(1) Any person shall be guilty
of a Class IV misdemeanor for the first violation and a Class II misdemeanor
for any subsequent violation of the same nature and in violation of the Plant Protection and Plant Pest
Act if that person:

(a) Distributes nursery stock without
a nursery stock distributor license issued under the Plant Protection
and Plant Pest Act;

(b) Receives nursery stock for further distribution from any person
who has not been duly licensed or approved under the act;

(c) Uses any license issued by the department after it has been revoked
or has expired, while the licensee was under suspension, or for purposes other
than those authorized by the act;

(d) Offers any hindrance or resistance to the department in the carrying
out of the act, including, but not limited to, denying or concealing information
or denying access to any property relevant to the proper enforcement of the
act;

(e) Allows any plant declared a nuisance plant as outlined in section
2-10,107 to exist on such person's property or distributes any such plants
or materials capable of harboring plant pests;

(f) Acts as a nursery
stock distributor and:

(i) Fails to comply with provisions for treatment or destruction of
nursery stock as required by withdrawal-from-distribution orders;

(ii) Distributes any quarantined nursery stock or nursery stock for
which a withdrawal-from-distribution order has been issued;

(iii) Distributes nursery stock for the purpose of further distribution
to any person in Nebraska not licensed as a nursery
stock distributor; or

(iv) Fails to pay all fees required by the act and the rules and regulations;

(g) Distributes nursery stock which is not sound, healthy, reasonably
capable of growth, labeled correctly, and free from injurious plant pests;

(h) Distributes plants which have been quarantined or are in a quarantined
area;

(i) Violates any item set forth as unlawful in section 2-10,106;

(j) Distributes biological control agents or genetically engineered
plant organisms without a permit if a permit is required by the act;

(k) Fails to keep and make available for examination by the department
all books, papers, and other information necessary for the enforcement of
the act;

(l) Violates any order of the director after such order has become final
or upon termination of any review proceeding when the order has been sustained
by a court of law; or

(m) Violates any other provision of the Plant Protection and Plant Pest
Act.

(2) Any lot or shipment of plants not in compliance with the Plant Protection
and Plant Pest Act, the rules and regulations, or both shall be subject to
seizure on complaint of the department to a court of competent jurisdiction
in the county in which such plants are located. If the court finds the plants
to be in violation of the act, the rules and regulations, or both and orders
the condemnation of the plants, such plants shall be disposed of in any manner
deemed necessary by the department. In no instance shall the disposition of
the plants be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant an opportunity
to apply to the court for release of such plants or for permission to treat
or relabel the plants to bring such plants into compliance with the act, the
rules and regulations, or both.

(3) It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or the county attorney
of the county in which any violation occurs or is about to occur, when notified
by the department of a violation or threatened violation, to pursue appropriate
proceedings without delay pursuant to this section, subdivision (6) of section
2-1091, or subsection (3) of section 2-10,103.02 or any combination thereof.

(4) Any person adversely affected by an order made by the department
pursuant to the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act may appeal such order,
and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 44;

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 29;

Laws 2013, LB68, § 21.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.